North Carolina statutes. Chapter 153A. Counties.
Article 2. Corporate Powers.

§ 153A-10.
State has 100 counties.

North Carolina has 100 counties. They are: Alamance, Alexander, Alleghany, Anson, Ashe, Avery, Beaufort, Bertie, Bladen, Brunswick, Buncombe, Burke, Cabarrus, Caldwell, Camden, Carteret, Caswell, Catawba, Chatham, Cherokee, Chowan, Clay, Cleveland, Columbus, Craven, Cumberland, Currituck, Dare, Davidson, Davie, Duplin, Durham, Edgecombe, Forsyth, Franklin, Gaston, Gates, Graham, Granville, Greene, Guilford, Halifax, Harnett, Haywood, Henderson, Hertford, Hoke, Hyde, Iredell, Jackson, Johnston, Jones, Lee, Lenoir, Lincoln, Macon, Madison, Martin, McDowell, Mecklenburg, Mitchell, Montgomery, Moore, Nash, New Hanover, Northampton, Onslow, Orange, Pamlico, Pasquotank, Pender, Perquimans, Person, Pitt, Polk, Randolph, Richmond, Robeson, Rockingham, Rowan, Rutherford, Sampson, Scotland, Stanly, Stokes, Surry, Swain, Transylvania, Tyrrell, Union, Vance, Wake, Warren, Washington, Watauga, Wayne, Wilkes, Wilson, Yadkin, and Yancey.

History.

1973, c. 822, s. 1.

§ 153A-11.
Corporate powers.

The inhabitants of each county are a body politic and corporate under the name specified in the act creating the county. Under that name they are vested with all the property and rights of property belonging to the corporation; have perpetual succession; may sue and be sued; may contract and be contracted with; may acquire and hold any property and rights of property, real and personal, that may be devised, sold, or in any manner conveyed, dedicated to, or otherwise acquired by the corporation, and from time to time may hold, invest, sell, or dispose of the property and rights of property; may have a common seal and alter and renew it at will; and have and may exercise in conformity with the laws of this State county powers, rights, duties, functions, privileges, and immunities of every name and nature.

History.

1868, c. 20, ss. 1, 2, 3, 8; 1876-7, c. 141, s. 1; Code, ss. 702, 703, 704, 707; Rev., ss. 1309, 1310, 1318; C.S., ss. 1290, 1291, 1297; 1973, c. 822, s. 1; 2011-284, s. 105.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-284, s. 105, effective June 24, 2011, deleted “bequeathed” following “that may be devised” in the second sentence.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on abrogation of contractual sovereign immunity, see 12 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1082 (1976).

§ 153A-12.
Exercise of corporate power.

Except as otherwise directed by law, each power, right, duty, function, privilege and immunity of the corporation shall be exercised by the board of commissioners. A power, right, duty, function, privilege, or immunity shall be carried into execution as provided by the laws of the State; a power, right, duty, function, privilege, or immunity that is conferred or imposed by law without direction or restriction as to how it is to be exercised or performed shall be carried into execution as provided by ordinance or resolution of the board of commissioners.

History.

1868, c. 20, ss. 1, 2; 1876-7, c. 141, s. 1; Code, ss. 702, 703; Rev., s. 1309; C.S., s. 1290; 1973, c. 882, s. 1.

§ 153A-13.
Continuing contracts.

A county may enter into continuing contracts, some portion or all of which are to be performed in ensuing fiscal years. In order to enter into such a contract, the county must have sufficient funds appropriated to meet any amount to be paid under the contract in the fiscal year in which it is made. In each year, the board of commissioners shall appropriate sufficient funds to meet the amounts to be paid during the fiscal year under continuing contracts previously entered into.

History.

1959, c. 250; 1973, c. 822, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to report on guaranteed energy savings contracts, see

G.S. 143-64.17

G.

§ 153A-14.
Grants and loans from other governments.

A county may contract for and accept grants and loans as permitted by

G.S. 160A-17.1

.

History.

1973, c. 822, s. 1; 2007-91, s. 2.

§ 153A-15.
Consent of board of commissioners necessary in certain counties before land may be condemned or acquired by a unit of local government outside the county.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Chapter 40A of the General Statutes or any other general law or local act conferring the power of eminent domain, before final judgment may be entered in any action of condemnation initiated by a county, city or town, special district, or other unit of local government which is located wholly or primarily outside another county, whereby the condemnor seeks to acquire property located in the other county, the condemnor shall furnish proof that the county board of commissioners of the county where the land is located has consented to the taking.

Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 153A-158

, 160A-240.1, 130A-55, or any other general law or local act conferring the power to acquire real property, before any county, city or town, special district, or other unit of local government which is located wholly or primarily outside another county acquires any real property located in the other county by exchange, purchase or lease, it must have the approval of the county board of commissioners of the county where the land is located.

This section applies to Alamance, Alleghany, Anson, Ashe, Bertie, Bladen, Brunswick, Burke, Buncombe, Cabarrus, Caldwell, Camden, Carteret, Caswell, Catawba, Chatham, Cherokee, Clay, Cleveland, Columbus, Craven, Cumberland, Currituck, Dare, Davidson, Davie, Duplin, Durham, Edgecombe, Forsyth, Franklin, Gaston, Gates, Graham, Granville, Greene, Guilford, Halifax, Harnett, Haywood, Henderson, Hoke, Hyde, Iredell, Jackson, Johnston, Jones, Lee, Lenoir, Lincoln, Macon, Madison, Martin, McDowell, Mecklenburg, Montgomery, Nash, New Hanover, Northampton, Onslow, Orange, Pamlico, Pasquotank, Pender, Perquimans, Person, Pitt, Polk, Richmond, Robeson, Rockingham, Rowan, Rutherford, Sampson, Scotland, Stanly, Stokes, Surry, Swain, Transylvania, Union, Vance, Wake, Warren, Watauga, Wayne, Wilkes, and Yancey Counties only.

This section does not apply as to any condemnation or acquisition of real property or an interest in real property by a city where the property to be condemned or acquired is within the corporate limits of that city.

History.

1981, c. 134, ss. 1, 2; c. 270, ss. 1, 2; c. 283, ss. 1-3; c. 459, s. 1; c. 941, s. 1; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1150, s. 1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 973, s. 1; c. 1061, s. 1; 1991, c. 615, s. 3; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 790, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 624, s. 1; c. 628, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 681, s. 1; 1997-164, s. 1; 1997-263, s. 1; 1998-110, s. 1; 1998-217, s. 47; 1999-6, s. 1; 2005-33, s. 1; 2013-174, s. 1; 2015-253, s. 13.

Local Modification.

Anson, Bertie, Buncombe, Burke, Caldwell: 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1061, s. 2; Caswell: 1981, c. 941, s. 2; Cleveland, Davidson, Davie, Forsyth: 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1061, s. 2; Granville: 1981, c. 941, s. 2; Kannapolis: 1997, c. 295; Martin, Montgomery: 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1061, s. 2; Person: 1981, c. 941, s. 2; Rowan, Transylvania: 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1061, s. 2; Vance, Warren: 1981, c. 941, s. 2; Wilkes: 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1061, s. 2; Town of Chapel Hill: 2004-119, s. 2.

§ 153A-15.1.
Agreement to make payment in lieu of future ad valorem taxes required before wetlands acquisition by a unit of local government.

Condemnation. — Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 153A-15

, Chapter 40A of the General Statutes, or any other general law or local act conferring the power of eminent domain, before a final judgment may be entered or a final condemnation resolution adopted in an action of condemnation initiated by a unit of local government whose property is exempt from tax under Section 2(3) of Article V of the North Carolina Constitution, whereby the condemnor seeks to acquire land for the purpose of wetlands mitigation, the condemnor shall agree in writing to pay to the county where the land is located a sum equal to the estimated amount of ad valorem taxes that would have accrued to the county for the next 20 years had the land not been acquired by the condemnor.

Purchase. — Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 130A-55

, 153A-15, 153A-158, 160A-240.1, or any other general law or local act conferring the power to acquire real property, before any unit of local government whose property is exempt from tax under Section 2(3) of Article V of the North Carolina Constitution purchases any land for the purpose of wetlands mitigation, the unit shall agree in writing to pay to the county where the land is located a sum equal to the estimated amount of ad valorem taxes that would have accrued to the county for the next 20 years had the land not been acquired by the acquiring unit.

Definition. — For purposes of this section, the “estimated amount of ad valorem taxes that would have accrued for the next 20 years” means the total assessed value of the acquired land excluded from the county’s tax base multiplied by the tax rate set by the county board of commissioners in its most recent budget ordinance adopted under Chapter 159 of the General Statutes, and then multiplied by 20.

Exception. — This section does not apply to any condemnation or acquisition of land by a city or special district if the land to be condemned or acquired is within the corporate limits of that city or special district or within the county where the city or special district is located.

Application. — This section applies only to land acquired in counties designated as a development tier one area under G.S. 143B-437.08.

History.

2004-188, s. 1; 2006-252, s. 2.17.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-252, s. 2.17, effective January 1, 2007, substituted “a development tier one area under G.S. 143B-437.08” for “an enterprise tier one or enterprise tier two area under G.S. 105-129.3” in subsection (e).

§ 153A-16.

Reserved for future codification purposes.